Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 2. Anatomical Gifts.

§ 32.1-289.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 92 and 907, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-289.1.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 92, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-289.2.
Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 465, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Former §

32.1-289.2

, pertaining to donation or sale of blood, body fluids, organs and tissues by persons infected with human immunodeficiency virus, derived from 1989, c. 613; 2017, c. 282.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 1.

§ 32.1-290.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 92 and 907, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-290.1.
Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 82, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-291.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 92 and 907, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-291.1.
Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act; short title.

This Act consists of §§

32.1-291.1

through

32.1-291.25

and may be cited as the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

Cross references.

As to submission of documents to Advance Health Care Directive Registry, see § 54.1-2995.

Uniform law cross references.

For other signatory state provisions, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala. § 22-19-160 et seq.

Arizona: A.R.S. § 36-841 et seq.

Arkansas: A.C.A. § 20-17-1201 et seq.

California: Cal. H & S Code § 7150 et seq.

Colorado: C.R.S. 12-34-101 et seq.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat. § 19a-289 et seq.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code § 7-1531.01 et seq.

Georgia: O.C.G.A. § 44-5-140 et seq.

Hawaii: HRS § 327-1 et seq.

Idaho: Idaho Code § 39-3401 et seq.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code Ann. § 29-2-16.1-1 et seq.

Iowa: Iowa Code § 142C.1 et seq.

Kansas: K.S.A. § 65-3220 et seq.

Kentucky: KRS § 311.1911 et seq.

Maine: 22 M.R.S. § 2941 et seq.

Maryland: Md. Estates and Trusts Code Ann. § 4-501 et seq.

Michigan: MCLS § 333.10101 et seq.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. § 525A.01 et seq.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann. § 41-39-101 et seq.

Missouri: § 194.210 et seq. R.S. Mo.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno., § 72-17-101 et seq.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb. § 71-4824 et seq.

New Hampshire: RSA 291-A:1 et seq.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 451.500 et seq.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat. § 26:6-77 et seq.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann. § 24-6B-1 et seq.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat. § 130A-412.3 et seq.

North Dakota: N.D. Cent. Code § 23-06.6-1 et seq.

Ohio: Pages’s ORC Ann. § 2108.01 et seq.

Oklahoma: 63 Okl. St. § 2200.1A et seq.

Oregon: O.R.S. § 97-951 et seq.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws § 23-18.6.1-1 et seq.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann., § 44-43-300 et seq.

South Dakota: S.D. Codified Laws, § 34-26-48 et seq.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann. § 68-30-101 et seq.

Texas: Texas Health & Safety Code § 692A.001 et seq.

Utah: Utah Code Ann. § 26-28-101 et seq.

Vermont: 18 V.S.A. § 5250a et seq.

Virgin Islands: 19 V.I.C. § 401 et seq.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash. § 68.64.010 et seq.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code § 16-19-1 et seq.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat. § 35-5-201 et seq.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-108 Advance Medical Directive. No. 15-110 Advance Medical Directive (Living Will Portion Only). No. 16-1913 Advance Medical Directive. No. 16-1913.4 Virginia Advance Directive Checklist. No. 16-1914 Medical Power of Attorney — Miscellaneous Clauses.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 1.

§ 32.1-291.2.
Definitions.

As used in this Act, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Adult”
means an individual who is at least 18 years of age.

“Agent”
means an individual:

Authorized to make health-care decisions on the principal’s behalf by a power of attorney for health care; or

Expressly authorized to make an anatomical gift on the principal’s behalf by any other record signed by the principal.

“Anatomical gift”
means a donation of all or part of a human body to take effect after the donor’s death for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

“Decedent”
means a deceased individual whose body or part is or may be the source of an anatomical gift. The term includes a stillborn infant and, subject to restrictions imposed by law other than this Act, a fetus.

“Disinterested witness”
means a witness other than the spouse, child, parent, sibling, grandchild, grandparent, or guardian of the individual who makes, amends, revokes, or refuses to make an anatomical gift, or another adult who exhibited special care and concern for the individual. The term does not include a person to whom an anatomical gift could pass under §

32.1-291.11

.

“Document of gift”
means a donor card or other record used to make an anatomical gift. The term includes a statement or symbol on a driver’s license, identification card, or donor registry.

“Donor”
means an individual whose body or part is the subject of an anatomical gift.

“Donor registry”
means a database that contains records of anatomical gifts.

“Driver’s license”
means a license or other document issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles under Chapter 3 (§ 46.2-300 et seq.) of Title 46.2 authorizing the operation of a motor vehicle upon the highways, whether or not conditions are attached to the license or other document.

“Eye bank”
means a person that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of human eyes or portions of human eyes and that is a member of the Virginia Transplant Council, accredited by the Eye Bank Association of America or the American Association of Tissue Banks and operating in the Commonwealth of Virginia.

“Guardian”
means a person appointed by a court to make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, or welfare of an individual. The term does not include a guardian ad litem, except when the guardian ad litem is authorized by a court to consent to donation.

“Hospital”
means a facility licensed as a hospital under the law of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by the United States, a state, or a subdivision of a state.

“Identification card”
means an identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles under Chapter 3 (§ 46.2-300 et seq.) of Title 46.2.

“Know”
means to have actual knowledge.

“Minor”
means an individual who is under 18 years of age.

“Organ procurement organization”
means a person designated by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services as an organ procurement organization that is also a member of the Virginia Transplant Council.

“Parent”
means a parent whose parental rights have not been terminated.

“Part”
means an organ, an eye, or tissue of a human being. The term does not include the whole body.

“Person”
means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Physician”
means an individual authorized to practice medicine or osteopathy under the law of any state.

“Procurement organization”
means an eye bank, organ procurement organization, or tissue bank that is a member of the Virginia Transplant Council.

“Prospective donor”
means an individual who is dead or whose death is imminent and has been determined by a procurement organization to have a part that could be medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education. The term does not include an individual who has made a refusal.

“Reasonably available”
means able to be contacted by a procurement organization without undue effort and willing and able to act in a timely manner consistent with existing medical criteria necessary for the making of an anatomical gift.

“Recipient”
means an individual into whose body a decedent’s part has been or is intended to be transplanted.

“Record”
means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Refusal”
means a record created under §

32.1-291.7

that expressly states an intent to bar other persons from making an anatomical gift of an individual’s body or part.

“Sign”
means, with the present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

1.

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

2.

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“State”
means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Technician”
means an individual determined to be qualified to remove or process parts by an appropriate organization that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law. The term includes an enucleator.

“Tissue”
means a portion of the human body other than an organ or an eye. The term does not include blood unless the blood is donated for the purpose of research or education.

“Tissue bank”
means a person that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of tissue and that is a member of the Virginia Transplant Council, accredited by the American Association of Tissue Banks, and operating in the Commonwealth of Virginia.

“Transplant hospital”
means a hospital that furnishes organ transplants and other medical and surgical specialty services required for the care of transplant patients.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907; 2020, cc. 1227, 1246.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and rewrote the definition for “Driver’s license,” which formerly read: “ ‘Driver’s license’ means a license or permit issued by the Virginia Department of Motor Vehicles to operate a vehicle, whether or not conditions are attached to the license or permit”; and in the definition for “Identification card” deleted “Virginia” preceding “Department of Vehicles” and added “under Chapter 3 (§ 46.2-300 et seq.) of Title 46.2.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 32.1-291.3.
Applicability of Act.

This Act applies to an anatomical gift or amendment to, revocation of, or refusal to make an anatomical gift, whenever made.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.4.
Who may make anatomical gift before donor’s death.

Subject to §

32.1-291.8

, an anatomical gift of a donor’s body or part may be made during the life of the donor for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education in the manner provided in §

32.1-291.5

by:

The donor, if the donor is an adult or if the donor is a minor and is:

Emancipated; or

Authorized under state law to apply for a driver’s license because the donor is at least 15 years and six months of age;

An agent of the donor, unless the power of attorney for health care or other record prohibits the agent from making an anatomical gift;

A parent of the donor, if the donor is an unemancipated minor; or

The donor’s guardian.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 32.1-291.5.
Manner of making anatomical gift before donor’s death.

A donor may make an anatomical gift:

By authorizing a statement or symbol indicating that the donor has made an anatomical gift to be imprinted on the donor’s driver’s license or identification card;

In a will;

During a terminal illness or injury of the donor, by any form of communication addressed to at least two adults; or

As provided in subsection B.

A donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under §

32.1-291.4

may make a gift by a donor card or other record signed by the donor or other person making the gift or by authorizing that a statement or symbol indicating that the donor has made an anatomical gift be included on a donor registry. If the donor or other person is physically unable to sign a record, the record may be signed by another individual at the direction of the donor or other person and shall:

Be witnessed by at least two adults, who have signed at the request of the donor or the other person; and

State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in subdivision 1.

Revocation, suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a driver’s license or identification card upon which an anatomical gift is indicated does not invalidate the gift.

An anatomical gift made by will takes effect upon the donor’s death whether or not the will is probated. Invalidation of the will after the donor’s death does not invalidate the gift.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.6.
Amending or revoking anatomical gift before donor’s death.

Subject to §

32.1-291.8

, a donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under §

32.1-291.4

may amend or revoke an anatomical gift by:

A record signed by:

The donor;

The other person; or

Subject to subsection B, another individual acting at the direction of the donor or the other person if the donor or other person is physically unable to sign; or

Later-executed document of gift that amends or revokes a previous anatomical gift or portion of an anatomical gift, either expressly or by inconsistency.

A record signed pursuant to subdivision A 1 c shall:

Be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the donor or the other person; and

State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in subdivision 1.

Subject to §

32.1-291.8

, a donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under §

32.1-291.4

may revoke an anatomical gift by the destruction or cancellation of the document of gift, or the portion of the document of gift used to make the gift, with the intent to revoke the gift.

A donor may amend or revoke an anatomical gift that was not made in a will by any form of communication during a terminal illness or injury addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness.

A donor who makes an anatomical gift in a will may amend or revoke the gift in the manner provided for amendment or revocation of wills or as provided in subsection A.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.7.
Refusal to make anatomical gift; effect of refusal.

An individual may refuse to make an anatomical gift of the individual’s body or part by:

A record signed by:

The individual; or

Subject to subsection B, another individual acting at the direction of the individual if the individual is physically unable to sign;

The individual’s will, whether or not the will is admitted to probate or invalidated after the individual’s death; or

Any form of communication made by the individual during the individual’s terminal illness or injury addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness.

A record signed pursuant to subdivision A 1 b shall:

Be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the individual; and

State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in subdivision 1.

An individual who has made a refusal may amend or revoke the refusal:

In the manner provided in subsection A for making a refusal;

By subsequently making an anatomical gift pursuant to §

32.1-291.5

that is inconsistent with the refusal; or

By destroying or canceling the record evidencing the refusal, or the portion of the record used to make the refusal, with the intent to revoke the refusal.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection H of §

32.1-291.8

, in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the individual set forth in the refusal, an individual’s unrevoked refusal to make an anatomical gift of the individual’s body or part bars all other persons from making an anatomical gift of the individual’s body or part.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.8.
Preclusive effect of anatomical gift, amendment, or revocation.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection G and subject to subsection F, in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor, a person other than the donor is barred from making, amending, or revoking an anatomical gift of a donor’s body or part if the donor made an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under §

32.1-291.5

or an amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under §

32.1-291.6

.

A donor’s revocation of an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under §

32.1-291.6

is not a refusal and does not bar another person specified in §

32.1-291.4

or

32.1-291.9

from making an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under §

32.1-291.5

or

32.1-291.10

.

If a person other than the donor makes an unrevoked anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under §

32.1-291.5

or an amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under §

32.1-291.6

, another person may not make, amend, or revoke the gift of the donor’s body or part under §

32.1-291.10

.

A revocation of an anatomical gift of a donor’s body or part under §

32.1-291.6

by a person other than the donor does not bar another person from making an anatomical gift of the body or part under §

32.1-291.5

or

32.1-291.10

.

In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under §

32.1-291.4

, an anatomical gift of a part is neither a refusal to give another part nor a limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of another part at a later time by the donor or another person.

In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under §

32.1-291.4

, an anatomical gift of a part for one or more of the purposes set forth in §

32.1-291.4

is not a limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of the part for any of the other purposes by the donor or any other person under §

32.1-291.5

or

32.1-291.10

.

If a donor who is an unemancipated minor dies, a parent of the donor who is reasonably available may revoke or amend an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part.

If an unemancipated minor who signed a refusal dies, a parent of the minor who is reasonably available may revoke the minor’s refusal.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.9.
Who may make anatomical gift of decedent’s body or part.

Subject to subsections B and C and unless barred by §

32.1-291.7

or

32.1-291.8

, an anatomical gift of a decedent’s body or part for purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education may be made by any member of the following classes of persons who is reasonably available, in the order of priority listed:

An agent of the decedent at the time of death who could have made an anatomical gift under subdivision 2 of §

32.1-291.4

immediately before the decedent’s death;

The persons who were acting as the guardians of the person of the decedent at the time of death;

The spouse of the decedent;

Adult children of the decedent;

Parents of the decedent;

Adult siblings of the decedent;

Adult grandchildren of the decedent;

Grandparents of the decedent;

An adult who exhibited special care and concern for the decedent; and

Any other person having the authority to dispose of the decedent’s body.

If there is more than one member of a class listed in subdivisions A 1, A 2, A 4, A 5, A 6, A 7, or A 8 entitled to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical gift may be made by a member of the class unless that member or a person to which the gift may pass under §

32.1-291.11

knows of an objection by another member of the class. If an objection is known, the gift may be made only by those members who constitute at least 50 percent of the class who are reasonably available.

A person may not make an anatomical gift if, at the time of the decedent’s death, a person in a prior class under subsection A is reasonably available to make or to object to the making of an anatomical gift.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.10.
Manner of making, amending, or revoking anatomical gift of decedent’s body or part.

A person authorized to make an anatomical gift under §

32.1-291.9

may make an anatomical gift by a document of gift signed by the person making the gift or by that person’s oral communication that is electronically recorded or is contemporaneously reduced to a record and signed by the individual receiving the oral communication.

Subject to subsection C, an anatomical gift by a person authorized under §

32.1-291.9

may be amended or revoked orally or in a record by any member of a prior class who is reasonably available. If more than one member of the prior class is reasonably available, the gift made by a person authorized under §

32.1-291.9

may be:

Amended only if a majority of the reasonably available members agree to the amending of the gift; or

Revoked only if a majority of the reasonably available members agree to the revoking of the gift.

A revocation under subsection B is effective only if, before an incision has been made to remove a part from the donor’s body or before invasive procedures have begun to prepare the recipient, the procurement organization, transplant hospital, or physician or technician knows of the revocation.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.11.
Persons that may receive anatomical gift; purpose of anatomical gift.

An anatomical gift may be made to the following persons named in the document of gift:

A hospital; accredited medical school, dental school, or institution of higher education; organ procurement organization; or other appropriate person authorized by the Virginia Transplant Council, for research or education;

Subject to subsection B, an individual designated by the person making the anatomical gift if the individual is the recipient of the part; or

An eye bank or tissue bank.

If an anatomical gift to an individual under subdivision A 2 cannot be transplanted into the individual, the part passes in accordance with subsection G in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the person making the anatomical gift.

If an anatomical gift of one or more specific parts or of all parts is made in a document of gift that does not name a person described in subsection A but identifies the purpose for which an anatomical gift may be used, the following rules apply:

If the part is an eye and the gift is for the purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate eye bank.

If the part is tissue and the gift is for the purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate tissue bank.

If the part is an organ and the gift is for the purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.

If the part is an organ, an eye, or tissue and the gift is for the purpose of research or education, the gift passes to the appropriate procurement organization.

For the purpose of subsection C, if there is more than one purpose of an anatomical gift set forth in the document of gift but the purposes are not set forth in any priority, the gift shall be used for transplantation or therapy, if suitable. If the gift cannot be used for transplantation or therapy, the gift may be used for research or education.

If an anatomical gift of one or more specific parts is made in a document of gift that does not name a person described in subsection A and does not identify the purpose of the gift, the gift may be used for transplantation, therapy, research and education, and the gift passes in accordance with subsection G. The gift shall be used first for transplantation or therapy, if suitable. If the gift cannot be used for transplantation or therapy, the gift may be used for research or education.

If a document of gift specifies only a general intent to make an anatomical gift by words such as “donor,” “organ donor,” or “body donor,” or by a symbol or statement of similar import, the gift may be used for transplantation, therapy, research and education and the gift passes in accordance with subsection G. The gift shall be used first for transplantation or therapy, if suitable. If the gift cannot be used for transplantation or therapy, the gift may be used for research or education.

For purposes of subsections B, E, and F the following rules apply:

If the part is an eye, the gift passes to the appropriate eye bank.

If the part is tissue, the gift passes to the appropriate tissue bank.

If the part is an organ, the gift passes to the appropriate organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.

An anatomical gift of an organ for transplantation, therapy, research or education other than an anatomical gift under subdivision A 2, passes to the organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.

If an anatomical gift does not pass pursuant to subsections A through H or the decedent’s body or part is not used for transplantation, therapy, research, or education, custody of the body or part passes to the surviving spouse, next of kin or other person under obligation to dispose of the body or part.

A person may not accept an anatomical gift if the person knows that the gift was not effectively made under §

32.1-291.5

or

32.1-291.10

or if the person knows that the decedent made a refusal under §

32.1-291.7

that was not revoked. For purposes of this subsection, if a person knows that an anatomical gift was made on a document of gift, the person is deemed to know of any amendment or revocation of the gift or any refusal to make an anatomical gift on the same document of gift.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision A 2, nothing in this Act affects the allocation of organs for transplantation therapy, research or education.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: in subdivision A 1, substituted “institution of higher education” for “college, or university”; and in subsection K, deleted “college, university, or other” preceding “institution of higher education” three times.

§ 32.1-291.12.
Search and notification.

The following persons shall make a reasonable search of an individual who the person reasonably believes is dead or whose death is imminent for a document of gift or other information identifying the individual as a donor or as an individual who made a refusal:

A law-enforcement officer, a firefighter, emergency medical services personnel, or other emergency rescuer finding the individual; and

If no other source of the information is immediately available, a hospital, as soon as practical after the individual’s arrival at the hospital.

If a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift is located by the search required by subdivision A 1 and the individual or deceased individual to whom it relates is taken to a hospital, the person responsible for conducting the search shall send the document of gift or refusal to the hospital.

A person is not subject to criminal or civil liability for failing to discharge the duties imposed by this section but may be subject to administrative sanctions.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “a firefighter, emergency medical services personnel” for “firefighter, paramedic” in subdivision A 1.

§ 32.1-291.13.
Delivery of document of gift not required; right to examine.

A document of gift need not be delivered during the donor’s lifetime to be effective.

Upon or after an individual’s death, a person in possession of a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift with respect to the individual shall allow examination and copying of the document of gift or refusal by a person authorized to make or object to the making of an anatomical gift with respect to the individual or by a person to which the gift could pass under §

32.1-291.11

.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.14.
Rights and duties of procurement organization and others.

When a hospital refers an individual who is dead or whose death is imminent to a procurement organization, the organization shall make a reasonable search of the records of the Virginia Department of Motor Vehicles and any donor registry that it knows exists for the geographical area in which the individual resides to ascertain whether the individual has made an anatomical gift.

A procurement organization shall be allowed reasonable access to information in the records of the Virginia Department of Motor Vehicles to ascertain whether an individual who is dead or whose death is imminent is a donor.

When a hospital refers an individual who is dead or whose death is imminent to a procurement organization, the organization may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to ensure the medical suitability of a part that is or could be the subject of an anatomical gift for transplantation, therapy, research, or education from a donor or a prospective donor. During the examination period, measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the part may not be withdrawn unless the hospital or procurement organization knows that the individual expressed a contrary intent.

Unless prohibited by law other than this Act, at any time after a donor’s death, the person to which a part passes under §

32.1-291.11

may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the body or part for its intended purpose.

Unless prohibited by law other than this Act, an examination under subsection C or D may include an examination of all medical and dental records of the donor or prospective donor.

Upon the death of a minor who was a donor or had signed a refusal, unless a procurement organization knows the minor is emancipated, the procurement organization shall conduct a reasonable search for the parents of the minor and provide the parents with an opportunity to revoke or amend the anatomical gift or revoke the refusal.

Upon referral by a hospital under subsection A, a procurement organization shall make a reasonable search for any person listed in §

32.1-291.9

having priority to make an anatomical gift on behalf of a prospective donor. If a procurement organization receives information that an anatomical gift to any other person was made, amended, or revoked, it shall promptly advise the other person of all relevant information.

Subject to subsection I of §

32.1-291.11

and §

32.1-291.23

, the rights of the person to which a part passes under §

32.1-291.11

are superior to the rights of all others with respect to the part. The person may accept or reject an anatomical gift in whole or in part. Subject to the terms of the document of gift and this Act, a person that accepts an anatomical gift of an entire body may allow embalming, burial or cremation, and use of remains in a funeral service. If the gift is of a part, the person to which the part passes under §

32.1-291.11

, upon the death of the donor and before embalming, burial, or cremation, shall cause the part to be removed without unnecessary mutilation.

Neither the physician who attends the decedent at death nor the physician who determines the time of the decedent’s death may participate in the procedures for removing or transplanting a part from the decedent.

A donated part from the body of a donor may be removed only by a physician or technician. The physician or technician performing the removal shall be qualified to remove the donated part from the body. For the purposes of this section, “qualified” means:

If the part is an organ, a physician or technician who is authorized by the appropriate organ procurement organization;

If the part is an eye, a physician or technician who is approved by an eye bank as qualified to perform the act of eye recovery; or

If the part is tissue, any physician or technician who is approved by LifeNet as qualified to perform the act of tissue recovery.An organ procurement organization may screen, test, and recover eyes and tissue on behalf of an eye bank or tissue bank. Any person authorized by this subsection to recover organs, tissues or eyes may draw blood from the donor and order such tests as may be appropriate to protect his health and the health of the recipients of the organs, tissues or eyes.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.15.
Coordination of procurement and use.

Each hospital in this state shall enter into agreements or affiliations with procurement organizations for coordination of procurement and use of anatomical gifts.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.16.
Sale or purchase of parts prohibited; penalty.

With the exception of hair, ova, blood, and other self-replicating body fluids, it shall be unlawful for any person to sell, to offer to sell, to buy, to offer to buy, or to procure through purchase any natural body part for any reason including, but not limited to, medical and scientific uses such as transplantation, implantation, infusion, or injection. Any person engaging in any of these prohibited activities shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the reimbursement of reasonable expenses associated with the removal, processing, preservation, quality control, storage, transportation, implantation, or disposal of a part.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the donation of any organs, tissues, or any natural body part, knowing that the donor is, or was, infected with a sexually transmitted infection, for use in medical or scientific research.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, this section shall not prohibit the donation or acquisition of organs for transplantation, provided that (i) the recipient of such organ is informed that such organ is infected with human immunodeficiency virus and, following such notice, consents to the receipt of such organ and (ii) acquisition and transplantation of such organ is in compliance with the provisions of the federal HIV Organ Policy Equity Act, 42 U.S.C. § 274f-5.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 465.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 465, effective July 1, 2021, added subsections C and D.

§ 32.1-291.17.
Falsification, etc. of document of gift; penalty.

A person that, in order to obtain a financial gain, intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or obliterates a document of gift, an amendment or revocation of a document of gift, or a refusal is guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 32.1-291.18.
Immunity.

A person that acts in accordance with this Act or with the applicable anatomical gift law of another state, or attempts in good faith to do so, is not liable for the act in a civil action, criminal prosecution, or administrative proceeding.

Neither the person making an anatomical gift nor the donor’s estate is liable for any injury or damage that results from the making or use of the gift.

In determining whether an anatomical gift has been made, amended, or revoked under this Act, a person may rely upon representations of an individual listed in subdivisions A 3, A 4, A 5, A 6, A 7, A 8, or A 9 of §

32.1-291.9

relating to the individual’s relationship to the donor or prospective donor unless the person knows that the representation is untrue.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Allegations of bad faith after harvesting insufficient. —

Parents of a donor alleged no facts that would support a judgment for bad faith under subsection D of former §

32.1-295

on the part of an organ procurement organization in harvesting tissues and organs for which they allegedly did not have consent; the acts of bad faith, if any, related to the parents’ allegations of what occurred after the harvesting of the body parts, and this allegation could not constitute a cause of action under the former statute. Fuss v. Lifenet, Inc., 61 Va. Cir. 422, 2003 Va. Cir. LEXIS 236 (Richmond Apr. 2, 2003) (decided under prior law).

§ 32.1-291.19.
Law governing validity; choice of law as to execution of document of gift; presumption of validity.

A document of gift is valid if executed in accordance with:

This Act;

The laws of the state or country where it was executed; or

The laws of the state or country where the person making the anatomical gift was domiciled, has a place of residence, or was a national at the time the document of gift was executed.

If a document of gift is valid under this section, the law of this state governs the interpretation of the document of gift.

A person may presume that a document of gift or amendment of an anatomical gift is valid unless that person knows that it was not validly executed or was revoked.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.

§ 32.1-291.20.
Donor registry.

For the purposes of this Act, the donor registry is the Virginia Donor Registry established under §

32.1-292.2

.

History.

2007, cc. 92, 907.